Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.861

Partnership interests—Transfer restrictions.

The limited partnership may restrict the transfer of partnership interests from the date the demand for their payment is received until the proposed merger becomes effective or the restriction is released under this article.

[ 2009 c 188 s 1207.]